Utah statutes.
10-6-132.   Loans by one fund to another -- Acquiring bonds for investment.
Subject to restrictions imposed by bond ordinance, statute or other
controlling regulations, the governing body of a city may (1) authorize
interfund loans from one fund to another at such interest rates and upon such
repayment terms and conditions as it may prescribe, and (2) with available
cash in any fund, purchase or otherwise acquire for investment unmatured bonds
of the city or of any fund of the city.
